Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 37.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2270
Purchase of
services with state funds; sliding-fee scale.

Services
identified by care plans for those not eligible for services provided through
the home and community-based waiver for the aged and disabled may be purchased
with funds appropriated through section
81-2235 based on a sliding-fee scale.

Laws 1993, LB 801, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 892;

Laws 2009, LB288, § 37.